Maryland, session 2025, HB0733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–801.
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle and in Title 3 of the Education Article,
the provisions of this article relating to the nomination and election of candidates to public
office shall govern the nomination and election of members to an elected county board of
education.
8–802.
(a) (1) (i) [Members] NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, MEMBERS of boards of education shall be elected on a nonpartisan basis.
(ii) In a primary election to nominate board of education candidates,
any registered voter of the county, regardless of party affiliation or lack of party affiliation,
is eligible to vote in those contests for nomination.
(2) Candidates for election to boards of education shall[, without party
designation or regard to party affiliation]:
(i) file certificates of candidacy;
(ii) be certified to the ballot;
(iii) appear on the ballot;
(iv) be voted on; and
(v) be nominated and elected.
(3) A CANDIDATE FOR ELECTION TO A BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY
DISCLOSE THE CANDIDATE’S PARTY DESIGNATION OR PARTY AFFILIATION ON THE
CANDIDATE’S CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY.
(b) This section does not apply to candidates for nomination or election to a board
of education if Title 3 of the Education Article requires a partisan election.
8–803.
(a) Before certifying the name of a board of education candidate to appear on the
ballot, the local board shall determine whether the candidate qualifies as provided under
Title 3 of the Education Article and Title 5 of this article.

HOUSE BILL 733 3
(b) (1) Unless Title 3 of the Education Article requires a partisan election AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, an individual may not
qualify as a board of education candidate or nominee by filing a petition or being nominated
by a political party.
(2) THE LOCAL BOARD MAY NOT DISQUALIFY A CANDIDATE UNDER
THIS SECTION BECAUSE THE CANDIDATE DISCLOSED THE CANDIDATE’S PARTY
DESIGNATION OR PARTY AFFILIATION UNDER § 8–802(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–205.1.
(A) IF A CANDIDATE FOR ELECTION TO A BOARD OF EDUCATION DISCLOSES
THE CANDIDATE’S PARTY DESIGNATION OR PARTY AFFILIATION ON THE
CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY UNDER § 8–802(A)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE LOCAL
BOARD SHALL INCLUDE THE PARTY DESIGNATION OR PARTY AFFILIATION OF THE
CANDIDATE ON THE BALLOT.
(B) UNLESS TITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE REQUIRES A PARTISAN
ELECTION, AN ELECTION FOR A CANDIDATE TO A BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL BE
NONPARTISAN REGARDLESS OF THE INCLUSION OF PARTY DESIGNATION OR PARTY
AFFILIATION ON A BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.